District of Columbia statutes.
26-706

Applicable laws, rules, and regulations.

Any District of Columbia bank that is controlled by a bank holding company that is not a District of Columbia bank holding company shall be subject to all laws of the District of Columbia and all rules and regulations under those laws that are applicable to District of Columbia banks that are controlled by bank holding companies all the bank subsidiaries of which are District of Columbia banks.

Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 7, 32 DCR 5954

History

1981 Ed., § 26-806.

Prior Codifications